New York, session 2025-2026, S10105.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 4 of section 14 of the public 2 housing law, as added by chapter 116 of the laws of 1997, the opening 3 paragraph as amended by section 3 of part A of chapter 760 of the laws 4 of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 5 (a) that unless otherwise prohibited by occupancy restrictions based 6 upon income limitations pursuant to federal, state or local law, regu- 7 lations or other requirements of governmental agencies, any member of 8 the tenant's family, as defined in paragraph (c) of this subdivision, 9 shall succeed to the rights of a tenant under such acts and laws where 10 the tenant has permanently vacated the housing accommodation and such 11 family member has resided with the tenant in the housing accommodation 12 as a primary residence for a period of no less than [two years] one 13 year, or where such person is a "senior citizen" or a "disabled person," 14 as defined in paragraph (c) of this subdivision, for a period of no less 15 than one year, immediately prior to the permanent vacating of the hous- 16 ing accommodation by the tenant, or from the inception of the tenancy or 17 commencement of the relationship, if for less than such periods. For the 18 purposes of this paragraph, "permanently vacated" shall mean the date 19 when the tenant of record permanently stops residing in the housing 20 accommodation regardless of subsequent contacts with the unit or the 21 signing of lease renewals or continuation of rent payments. The minimum 22 periods of required residency set forth in this subdivision shall not be 23 deemed to be interrupted by any period during which the "family member" 24 temporarily relocates because [he or she] such family member: 25 (i) is engaged in active military duty; 26 (ii) is enrolled as a full time student; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02099-02-5 S. 10105 2 1 (iii) is not in residence at the housing accommodation pursuant to a 2 court order not involving any term or provision of the lease, and not 3 involving any grounds specified in the real property actions and 4 proceedings law; 5 (iv) is engaged in employment requiring temporary relocation from the 6 housing accommodation; 7 (v) is hospitalized for medical treatment; or 8 (vi) has such other reasonable grounds that shall be determined by the 9 commissioner upon application by such person. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.